Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2102.   Agreements between procurement units.

A procurement unit may enter into an agreement with one or more other procurement units to:

(1)  sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative agreement for:

(a)  the procurement of a procurement item, in accordance with the requirements of Section 63G-6a-2105; or

(b)  the disposal of a procurement item;

(2)  cooperatively use a procurement item;

(3)  commonly use or share warehousing facilities, capital equipment, and other facilities;

(4)  provide personnel, if the receiving procurement unit pays the procurement unit providing the personnel the direct and indirect cost of providing the personnel, in accordance with the agreement; or

(5)  make available informational, technical, and other services, if:

(a)  the requirements of the procurement unit tendering the services have precedence over the procurement unit that receives the services; and

(b)  the receiving procurement unit pays the expenses of the services provided, in accordance with the agreement.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

